Tennessee, session 114, HB0617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as "Tucker's Law."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The month of October is designated as "Fentanyl Poisoning Awareness
Month" in all public schools to educate students about the dangers posed by the drug
fentanyl and the risks of fentanyl poisoning, including overdose.
(b) During Fentanyl Poisoning Awareness Month, each LEA and public charter
school shall provide age-appropriate, research-based instruction related to fentanyl
abuse prevention and drug poisoning awareness to students in grades six through
twelve (6-12).
(c) The instruction required pursuant to subsection (b) must include:
(1) Suicide prevention;
(2) Prevention of the abuse of and addiction to fentanyl;
(3) Awareness of local school and community resources and any
processes involved in accessing those resources; and
(4) Health education that includes information about substance use and
abuse, including youth substance use and abuse.
(d) The instruction required pursuant to subsection (b) may be provided by an
entity or an employee or agent of an entity that is:
HB0617
002387
- 1 -

(1) A public or private institution of higher education;
(2) A library;
(3) A community service organization;
(4) A religious organization;
(5) A local public health agency; or
(6) An organization employing mental health professionals.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002387